District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1111.07

Periodic payments to Authority.

Repealed.

Dec. 9, 1969, Pub. L. 91-143, § 10
July 13, 1972, 86 Stat. 465, Pub. L. 92-349, title I, § 101
Jan. 3, 1980, 93 Stat. 1323, Pub. L. 96-184, § 3(c)
1981 Ed., § 1-2459.
1973 Ed., § 1-1447.